Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-911
Right to strike; right to work; freedom of speech.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, nothing contained in sections 48-901 to 48-912 shall be construed so as to interfere with or impede or diminish in any way the right to strike or the right of individuals to work; nor shall anything in sections 48-901 to 48-912 be so construed as to invade unlawfully the right to freedom of speech.

Laws 1959, c. 231, § 11, p. 810.